Ohio, session 136, HB592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 707.02 and 707.29 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 707.02. The petition required by section 707.01 of the Revised Code shall be signed by fifty-one per cent of the electors within the territory proposed to be incorporated, as determined by the total number of votes cast within that territory for the office of governor at the preceding general election for that office, and shall contain or have attached thereto: (A) A full description and an accurate map of the territory within the proposed municipal corporation; (B) A statement signed by the county auditor as to the total assessed valuation of the area proposed for incorporation; (C) A statement that the area consists of not less than two square miles, includes a population of not less than eight hundred persons per square mile, and has an assessed valuation of real, personal, and public utility property subject, except as otherwise provided in this division, to general property taxation of at least three thousand five hundred dollars per capita. In determining per capita assessed valuation under this division, the assessed valuation of any tangible personal property, buildings, structures, improvements, and fixtures that are exempt from taxation under division (B) of section 5709.081 of the Revised Code shall be added to the assessed valuation of real, personal, and public utility property subject to general property taxation. (D) A statement by the secretary of state that the name proposed in the petition is not being used by any other municipal corporation in the state; (E) The name of a person to act as agent for the petitioners; (F) A statement of whether or not the proposed municipal corporation contains and includes territory within three miles of any portion of the boundary of an existing municipal corporation. Sec. 707.29. (A) Cities may be incorporated in the manner provided in sections 707.29 and 707.30 of the Revised Code. Application for incorporation of a city shall be made by petition addressed to the board of county commissioners. The territory proposed for incorporation as a city shall meet all of the following criteria: (1) It shall consist of not less than four square miles. (2) It shall have a population of not less than twenty-five five thousand and a population density of at least one thousand persons per square mile. (3) It shall have an assessed valuation of real, personal, and public utility property subject, except as otherwise provided in division (A)(3) of this section, to general property taxation of at least twenty-five hundred dollars per capita. In determining per capita assessed valuation under division (A)(3) of this section, the assessed valuation of any tangible personal property, buildings, structures, improvements, and fixtures that are exempt from taxation under division (B) of section 5709.081 of the Revised Code shall be added to the assessed valuation of real, personal, and public utility property subject to general property taxation. (4) It shall not completely surround an existing municipal corporation. (5) It shall be contiguous. (B) No territory within the boundaries of a military base, camp, or similar installation under the jurisdiction of a military department of the United States government, that is used for the housing of members of the armed forces of the United States and is a center for military operations of the department shall be incorporated without the approval of the secretary of defense of the United States, hisa designee of the secretary of defense, or other person having authority under federal law to give such approval. Section 2. That existing sections 707.02 and 707.29 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That section 707.04 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.